New York, session 2025-2026, S4848.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3 of chapter 670 of the laws of 2021 requiring the 2 office for people with developmental disabilities to establish the care 3 demonstration program, as amended by section 13 of part B of chapter 57 4 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 5 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 6 deemed repealed March 31, [2026] 2028. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09547-01-5